Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-203
Certificate; contents.

(1) The person taking an acknowledgment shall certify that:

(a) The person acknowledging appeared before him or her and acknowledged he or she executed the instrument; and

(b) The person acknowledging was known to the person taking the acknowledgment or that the person taking the acknowledgment had satisfactory evidence that the person acknowledging was the person described in and who executed the instrument.

(2) For purposes of this section, appearance before the person taking an acknowledgment includes an appearance outside the presence of a notary public if such acknowledgment was completed in accordance with the Online Notary Public Act.

Laws 1969, c. 523, § 3, p. 2141;

Laws 2019, LB186, § 22.

Online Notary Public Act, see section 64-401.

An attestation clause that does not list a name in the acknowledgment section is incomplete. Johnson v. Neth, 276 Neb. 886, 758 N.W.2d 395 (2008).